Tennessee, session 114, HB2566.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 15, Chapter 2, is amended by adding
the following as a new section:
August 8 of each year is observed as "Clog Dancing Day in the Volunteer State"
to recognize the cultural, educational, and artistic contributions of clog dancing to this
state and nation, and to encourage all Tennesseans to celebrate the history, musicality,
and community spirit of this cherished Appalachian tradition.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010782